Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 9. Use of Drugs in Animals in Livestock
Competitions

§ 391.
Definitions.

In addition to those definitions set forth in section 351 of this title, the following words shall have the following definitions:

“Animal pulling contest” means a pulling contest in which weights are pulled by animals for competitive purposes.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or a designee.

“Competitive event” means pulling contests, trail rides, shows, and any other competition for premiums or prizes involving animals.

“Drug” means those substances identified under 18 V.S.A. § 4051(5).

“Owner” means any person, partnership, or corporation having title to animals in any competitive event.

“Superintendent” means any individual designated to control animals during any livestock competition.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 392.
Administration of drugs; violation; rules.

No person shall administer internally or externally a drug that may affect or alter the normal performance of an animal entered in an animal pulling contest or competitive event. Any animal so treated shall be disqualified, and any award, premium, or trophy forfeited.

The Secretary shall establish rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 393.
Statement of ownership.

A signed statement of ownership in the name of the handler, including a description of the animal, shall be submitted to the superintendent before the start of a competitive event or animal pulling contest.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 394.
Testing.

The Secretary may take specimens for drug testing of saliva, blood, or urine, or all three, from any animal entered in an animal pulling contest or a competitive event. If a drug is found in a chemical analysis of the saliva, urine, or blood, it shall be prima facie evidence that a drug has been administered. A proper chain of evidence shall be maintained.

The Secretary may assess and retain a fee for the taking of a drug test sufficient to recoup the expense of the test procedure.

Failure of an owner or handler to submit an animal for testing on request shall be treated under this chapter as if the presence of a drug were found in a test performed on the animal.

Failure to provide adequate information or assistance in animal restraint for the Secretary to obtain an official sample shall be a violation of this section, subject to the penalty provision of section 397 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1993, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 395.
Hearing; finding; order.

Within 14 calendar days from the date test results are received by the Secretary, the Secretary shall notify the superintendent of the animal pulling contest or competitive event, and the animal’s owner, of the results.
If the presence of a drug is found in the test, the Secretary shall hold a hearing, at which the owner of the animal or a representative of the owner may appear and be heard.
On the basis of all evidence presented, the Secretary shall issue a finding of whether the provisions of this subchapter have been violated.
The Secretary shall make an appropriate order of whether the owner, the representative of the owner, or the animal shall be eligible to participate in future competitive events or animal pulling contests held in this State.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 396.
Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by a finding and order or penalty of the Secretary under this subchapter may appeal to the Superior Court in the county in which the animal pulling contest or competitive event was held.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 397.
Administrative penalty.

In addition to the forfeiture of any award, premium, or trophy otherwise due, and in addition to other penalties provided by law, a person violating this chapter may be assessed an administrative penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000.00 by the Secretary. The Secretary shall utilize the provisions of 6 V.S.A. §§ 16 and 17 for purposes of assessing the penalty.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003; 2019, No. 77, § 8, eff. June 19, 2019.

§ 398.
Loss of eligibility.

Any person fined or convicted of administering an unlawful drug to animals entered in a competitive event or animal pulling contest held in another state shall be ineligible to compete in any animal pulling contest or competitive event in this State for a period not to exceed two years from the date of such fine or court conviction.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 399.
Abuse; disqualification.

Any person found rein-whipping or otherwise whipping a horse in an animal pulling contest under this subchapter shall be automatically disqualified, and be ineligible to receive any award, premium, or trophy. The light use of reins applied to the hindquarters may be permitted on entry to the pit and while the team is making its draw. The use of reins for other than guiding the animals at any other time is prohibited.

Any person found face-whipping cattle in an animal pulling contest shall be automatically disqualified and ineligible to receive any award, premium, or trophy. If a goad stick is used in the contest, it must be made of wood, not taped, and not more than 3/4 inches in diameter.

Excessive violation of either subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be deemed a violation of subdivision 352(2) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 400.
Alcohol breath test; disqualification.

A superintendent may require that contestants or other participants at an animal pulling contest or competitive event pass a breathalyzer test for alcohol.
The test shall be conducted by the State Police, sheriff, or local police before the contest or event occurs.
Any person above a 0.10 percent concentration level shall be disqualified and barred from participation in any animal pulling contest or competitive event on the day of the test.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.